FST/hsi/morph_hsi_pro.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
	%+PRO
	%+NOM %+ACC %+non{NOM/ACC}
	%+SG %+PL

LEXICON Root
māy pronoun;
attu pronoun;
ho pronoun;
he pronoun;
māy%+PRO%+non{NOM/ACC}%+SG:mānā #;
māy%+PRO%+ACC%+SG:māke #;
māy%+PRO%+NOM%+PL:āse #;
attu%+PRO%+non{NOM/ACC}%+SG:tān #;
attu%+PRO%+ACC%+SG:tānke #;
ho%+PRO%+NOM%+PL:hoven #;
he%+PRO%+NOM%+PL:hozen #;
attu%+PRO%+NOM%+PL:āve #;  ! paper description

LEXICON pronoun
%+PRO%+NOM%+SG:0 #;
